Connecticut, session 2026, HB05083.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 219 of the general statutes be amended to (1) increase to
more than seventy-five thousand dollars the sales price threshold for a
motor vehicle subject to the seven and three-fourths per cent sales and
use taxes rate, and (2) limit the application of said rate to the portion of
the sales price exceeding the threshold amount.